District of Columbia statutes.
16-4604.06

Contents of petition.

A petition under this subchapter shall be verified and include a copy of any existing child-custody determination, if available. The petition shall specify the risk factors for abduction, including the relevant factors described in § 16-4604.07. Subject to § 16-4602.09(e), if reasonably ascertainable, the petition shall contain:

(1)

The name, date of birth, and gender of the child;

(2)

The customary address and current physical location of the child;

(3)

The identity, customary address, and current physical location of the respondent;

(4)

A statement of whether a prior action to prevent abduction or domestic violence has been filed by a party or other individual or entity having custody of the child, and the date, location, and disposition of the action;

(5)

A statement of whether a party to the proceeding has been arrested for a crime related to domestic violence, stalking, or child abuse or neglect, and the date, location, and disposition of the case; and

(6)

Any other information required to be submitted to the court for a child-custody determination under § 16-4602.09.

History

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(d), 56 DCR 1572

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act.